Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202052-1317
Verification of security interest; seller; duty.

In order to verify the existence or nonexistence of a security interest, a buyer, commission merchant, or selling agent may request a seller to disclose such seller's approved unique identifier.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 67;

Laws 2015, LB464, § 3.